test/src/gt-norm-yamls/X-misc_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
    isotinka+N+Sg+Par: istotinkkaa #isotinkaa
    
    jalka+N+Sg+Par: jalkkaa #jalkaa
    
    jovenranta+N+Sg+Par: jovenranttaa #jovenrantaa
    
    järki+N+Sg+Par: järkkee #järkee
    
    järvenranta+N+Sg+Par: järvenranttaa #järvenrantaa
    
    kahđeksantoistasađan-luku+N+Sg+Par:  kahđeksantoistasađan-lukkuu #kahđeksantoistasađan-lukuu
    
    kampa+N+Sg+Par: kamppaa #kampaa
    
    kariranta+N+Sg+Par: kariranttaa #karirantaa
    
    kattokivi+N+Sg+Par: kattokivvee #kattokivee
    
    kerta+N+Sg+Par: kerttaa #kertaa
    
    keski-ikä+N+Sg+Par: keski-ikkää #keski-ikää
    
    kesäilta+N+Sg+Par: kesäilttaa #kesäiltaa
    
    #kiiski+N+Sg+Par: kiskee #kiiskii (?)
    
    kilpa+N+Sg+Par: kilppaa #kilpaa
    
    kivi+N+Sg+Par: kivvee #kivee
    
    kiviranta+N+Sg+Par: kiviranttaa #kivirantaa
    
    koni+N+Sg+Par: konnii #konii
    
    kruuva-ala+N+Sg+Par: kruuva-allaa #kruuva-alaa
    
    kulttuuri-ilta+N+Sg+Par: kulttuuri-ilttaa #kulttuuri-iltaa
    
    kunta+N+Sg+Par: kunttaa #kuntaa
    
    kurki+N+Sg+Par: kurkkee #kurkee
    
    kylki+N+Sg+Par: kylkkee #kylkee
    
    kynttilänjalka+N+Sg+Par: kynttilänjalkkaa #kynttilänjalkaa
    
    käymäsilta+N+Sg+Par: käymäsilttaa #käymäsiltaa
    
    laava-ala+N+Sg+Par: laava-allaa #laava-alaa
    
    #laji+N+Sg+Par:   lajjii #lajii (?)
    
    lanka+N+Sg+Par: lankkaa #lankaa
    
    lannanreki+N+Sg+Par: lannanrekkii #lannanrekii
    
    lanta+N+Sg+Par: lanttaa #lantaa
    
    #leipäfati+N+Sg+Par: leipäfattii #leipäfatii (?)
    
    #likiala+N+Sg+Par: likiallaa #likialaa (?)
    
    lohi+N+Sg+Par: lohta #lohee
    
    maakunta+N+Sg+Par: maakunttaa #maakuntaa
    
    #maanpruuki+N+Sg+Par: maanpruukkii #maanpruukii (?)
    
    maanpruuki-ala+N+Sg+Par: maanpruuki-allaa #maanpruuki-alaa
    
    merenranta+N+Sg+Par: merenranttaa #merenrantaa
    
    merkkikivi+N+Sg+Par: merkkikivvee #merkkikivee
    
    minoriteettinuori+N+Sg+Par: minoriteettinuorta #minoriteettinuoree
    
    
    muki+N+Sg+Par: mukkii #mukii
    
    multa+N+Sg+Par: multtaa #multaa
    
    myllykivi+N+Sg+Par: myllykivvee #myllykivee
    
    myötävirta+N+Sg+Par: myötävirttaa #myötävirtaa
    
    nepu+N+Sg+Par: neppuu #nepuu
    
    nimi+N+Sg+Par: nimmee #nimee
    
    nätälumi+N+Sg+Par: nätälunta #nätäluntä
    
    olka+N+Sg+Par: olkkaa #olkaa
    
    onki+N+Sg+Par: onkkee #onkee
    
    ovi+N+Sg+Par: ovvee #ovee
    
    ođottama-aika+N+Sg+Par: ođottama-aikkaa #ođottama-aikaa
    
    paikannimi+N+Sg+Par: paikannimmee #paikannimee
    
    #palkkio+N+Sg+Par: palkkiota #palkkioo (?)
    
    pariskunta+N+Sg+Par: pariskunttaa #pariskuntaa
    
    parta+N+Sg+Par: parttaa #partaa
    
    peli+N+Sg+Par: pellii #pelii
    
    piikkilanka+N+Sg+Par: piikkilankkaa #piikkilankaa
    
    pikilanka+N+Sg+Par: pikilankkaa #pikilankaa
    
    pinta+N+Sg+Par: pinttaa #pintaa
    
    pohjakerta+N+Sg+Par: pohjakerttaa #pohjakertaa
    
    pöräjalka+N+Sg+Par: pöräjalkkaa #pöräjalkaa
    
    pöränimi+N+Sg+Par: pöränimmee #pöränimee
    
    pöyđänjalka+N+Sg+Par: pöyđänjalkkaa  #pöyđänjalkaa
    
    rahtukivi+N+Sg+Par: rahtukivvee #rahtukivee
    
    raja-ala+N+Sg+Par: raja-allaa #raja-alaa
    
    rampa+N+Sg+Par: ramppaa #rampaa
    
    ranka+N+Sg+Par: rankkaa #rankaa
    
    ranta+N+Sg+Par: ranttaa #rantaa
    
    ranta-ala+N+Sg+Par: ranta-allaa #ranta-alaa
    
    #rautapruuki+N+Sg+Par: rauta-pruukkii #rautapruukii (?)
    
    rinta+N+Sg+Par: rinttaa #rintaa
    
    rivi+N+Sg+Par: rivvii #rivii
    
    rovi+N+Sg+Par: rovvii #rovii
    
    runka+N+Sg+Par: runkkaa #runkaa
    
    ryssänlohi+N+Sg+Par: ryssänlohta #ryssänlohee
    
    #sahapruuki+N+Sg+Par: sanapruukkii #sahapruukii (?)
    
    #saiti+N+Sg+Par: saittii #saitii (?)
    
    sali+N+Sg+Par: sallii #salii
    
    sanka+N+Sg+Par: sankkaa #sankaa
    
    santa+N+Sg+Par: santtaa #santaa
    
    sarka+N+Sg+Par: sarkkaa #sarkaa
    
    savi+N+Sg+Par: savvee #savee
    
    savvulohi+N+Sg+Par: savvulohta #savvulohii
    
    seittementoistasattaa-luku+N+Sg+Par: seittementoistasattaa-lukkuu #seittementoistasattaa-lukuu
    
    seurakunta+N+Sg+Par: seurakunttaa #seurakuntaa
    
    #siiti+N+Sg+Par: siittii #siitii (?)
    
    silmänväli+N+Sg+Par: silmävällii #silmänvälii
    
    silta+N+Sg+Par: silttaa #siltaa
    
    solki+N+Sg+Par: solkkee #solkee
    
    sompa+N+Sg+Par: somppaa #sompaa
    
    sonka+N+Sg+Par: sonkkaa #sonkaa
    
    sonta+N+Sg+Par: sonttaa #sontaa
    
    sota-aika+N+Sg+Par:  sota-aikkaa #sota-aikaa
    
    strenka+N+Sg+Par: strenkkaa #strenkaa
    
    stryykirauta+N+Sg+Par: stryykirauttaa #stryykirautaa
    
    sukunimi+N+Sg+Par: sukunimmee #sukunimee
    
    sulka+N+Sg+Par: sulkkaa #sulkaa
    
    suola-ala+N+Sg+Par: suola-allaa #suola-alaa
    
    suolalohi+N+Sg+Par: suolalohta #suolalohii
    
    # suorki+N+Sg+Par: suorkkee #suorkee (?)
    
    suunta+N+Sg+Par: suunttaa #suuntaa
    
    suvi+N+Sg+Par: suvvee #suvee
    
    #syli+N+Sg+Par: syllii #sylii (?)
    
    syysilta+N+Sg+Par: syysilttaa #syysiltaa
    
    syyslohi+N+Sg+Par: syyslohta #syyslohee
    
    takajalka+N+Sg+Par: takajalkkaa #takajalkaa
    
    takarivi+N+Sg+Par: takarivvii #takarivii
    
    #tali+N+Sg+Par: tallii #talii (?)
    
    taraslohi+N+Sg+Par: taraslohta #taraslohii
    
    tavi+N+Sg+Par: tavvii #tavii
    
    #teefati+N+Sg+Par: teefattii #teefatii
    
    tiilikivi+N+Sg+Par: tiilikivvee #tiilikivee
    
    tinka+N+Sg+Par: tinkkaa #tinkaa
    
    toimheentulo+N+Sg+Par: toimheentulloo #toimheentuloo
    
    #tovi+N+Sg+Par: tovvii #tovii
    
    tunka+N+Sg+Par: tunkkaa #tunkaa
    
    turpa+N+Sg+Par: turppaa #turpaa
    
    turvetsarka+N+Sg+Par: turvetsarkkaa #turvetsarkaa
    
    tuuki+N+Sg+Par: tuukkii #tuukii
    
    tyvi+N+Sg+Par: tyvvee #tyvee
    
    uhrikivi+N+Sg+Par: uhrikivvee #uhrikivee
    
    ulko-ovi+N+Sg+Par: ulko-ovvee #ulko-ovee
    
    urpa+N+Sg+Par: urppaa #urpaa
    
    vaarankylki+N+Sg+Par: vaarankylkkee #vaarankylkee
    
    vaaranolka+N+Sg+Par: vaaranolkkaa #vaaranolkaa
    
    valta+N+Sg+Par: valttaa #valtaa
    
    valtakunta+N+Sg+Par: valtakunttaa #valtakuntaa
    
    vapaa-aika+N+Sg+Par: vapaa-aikkaa #vapaa-aikaa
    
    #vappaakauppa-ala+N+Sg+Par: vappaakauppa-allaa #vappaakauppa-alaa (?)
    
    vastaranta+N+Sg+Par: vastaranttaa #vastarantaa
    
    vastavirta+N+Sg+Par: vastavirttaa #vastavirtaa
    
    velka+N+Sg+Par: velkkaa #velkaa
    
    verka+N+Sg+Par: verkkaa #verkaa
    
    verta+N+Sg+Par: verttaa #vertaa
    
    vesimuki+N+Sg+Par: vesimukkii #vesimukii
    
    vestaranta+N+Sg+Par: vestaranttaa #vestarantaa
    
    viika+N+Sg+Par: viikkaa #viikaa
    
    villalanka+N+Sg+Par: villalankkaa #villalankaa
    
    virka+N+Sg+Par: virkkaa #virkaa
    
    virta+N+Sg+Par: virttaa #virtaa
    
    väkivalta+N+Sg+Par: väkivalttaa #väkivaltaa
    
    väli+N+Sg+Par: vällii #välii
    
    yhtheiskunta+N+Sg+Par: yhtheiskunttaa #yhtheiskuntaa
    
    yhđeksentoistasađan-luku+N+Sg+Par: yhđeksentoistasađan-lukkuu #yhđeksentoistasađan-lukuu
    
    öljyputki+N+Sg+Par: öljyputkee #öljyputkii
    
    # ------------------------------------------------
    
    aijankäännet+N+Sg+Ill: aijankääntheesseen #aijankäännheesseen
    
    
    # ------------------------------------------------
    
    
    sukalttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sukalsin  # sukalain
    
    vahventtaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vahvensin    # vahventain
    
    ajattaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajatin # ajatain
    
    rukattaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rukatin   # rukatain
    
    ailattaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ailatin    # ailatain
    
    juovattaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juovatin    # juovatain
    
    langettaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: langetin    # langetain
    
    vahingoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vahingoitin    # vahingoitain
    
    kunnioittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kunnioitin    # kunnioitain
    
    lahjoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lahjoitin    # lahjoitain
    
    osoittaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: osoitin    # osoitain
    
    # mistanttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mistantin    # mistantain
    
    vaijenttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vaijensin    # vaijentain
    
    ojenttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ojensin    # ojentain
    
    vahventtaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vahvensin    # vahventain
    
    isonttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: isonsin    # isontain
    
    laikottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laikotin    # laikotain
    
    vasthaanottaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vasthaanotin    # vasthaanotain
    
    pelastaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pelastin    # pelastain
    
    sairastaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sairastin    # sairastain
    
    aivastaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aivastin    # aivastain
    
    norjalaistaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: norjalaistin # norjalaistain
    
    ruiđalaistaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruiđalaistin # ruiđalaistain
    
    # ok
    
    kolistaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolistin
    
    tođistaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tođistin
    
    eđesauttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: eđesautoin
    
    happanuttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: happanutin
    
    oksenuttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oksenutin
    
    muretuttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: muretutin # muretutain
    
    aivastuttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aivastutin # aivastutain
    
    liikahtaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: liikahđin # liikahđain
    
    joukahtaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: joukahđin # joukahđain
    
    naiđa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nain
    
    vihkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vihin
    
    pyhkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pyhkin # pyhiin
    
    naakkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: naakin
    
    lakkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lakin
    
    leikkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leikin
    
    palkkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: palkin # palkiin
    
    hankkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hankin
    
    kuokkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuokin
    
    ruokkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruokin
    
    härkkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: härkin # härkiin
    
    kukkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kukin
    
    tukkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tukin
    
    sivakoiđa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sivakoin
    
    voiđa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: voin
    
    kraappiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kraapin
    
    oppiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: opin
    
    hyppiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hypin
    
    praattiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: praatin
    
    vaattiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vaađin # vaatin
    
    purjettiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: purjetin
    
    murettiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: muretin
    
    vaatettiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vaatetin
    
    ilvettiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ilvetin # ilvetiin
    
    viittiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viitin
    
    moittiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: moitin
    
    hättiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hätin # hätiin
    
    uiđa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uin
    
    puiđa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puin
    
    vihkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vihkin
    
    pyhkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pyhkin
    
    # joikkaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: joikin
    
    # poikkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poikin
    
    kokkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kojin
    
    purkkaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: purin
    
    # märkkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: märkin
    
    nykkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nyvin # nykin
    
    rykkiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ryvin # rykin
    
    juoskenella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juoskentelin # juoskenelin
    
    komenella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: komentelin # komenelin
    
    kevenellä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keventelin # kevenelin
    
    vahvenella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vahventelin # vahvenelin
    
    # pehmiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pehmin
    
    henkkaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: henkasin # hengoin
    
    jakkaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jajoin # jakoin
    
    # kankkoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kankoin
    
    # salppaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: salpoin
    
    # kaarttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaaroin
    
    # raattaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: raađoin # raatoin
    
    kylppeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kylvin #  kylpin
    
    keijata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keikasin # korjattu keikata
    
    rinkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rinkkasin
    
    pruukata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pruukkasin
    
    # jatkata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jatkasin
    
    suunata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: suuntasin # suunasin
    
